Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-320
Sales agent, defined.

Sales agent shall mean any person who markets, sells, or delivers any pickle card unit on behalf of a licensed organization to any licensed pickle card operator.

Laws 1985, LB 408, § 8;

R.S.Supp.,1985, § 9-140.13;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 86;

Laws 1988, LB 1232, § 16.